Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma
Community Health Worker Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Community Health Worker Act:

Req. No. 11346 Page 1

1. “Certified community health worker” means a community health
worker to whom the State Department of Health has issued a
certificate to practice as a certified community health worker in
this state;
2. “Community health worker” means a frontline public health
worker who has a shared understanding of and is a trusted member in
the community being served; and
3. “Department” means the State Department of Health.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.3 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Health shall establish a certificate
for community health workers. This certification shall be
voluntary.
B. A certified community health worker may:
1. Serve as a liaison between health and social services and
the community to facilitate access to services and improve the
quality and cultural competence of service delivery;
2. Assist in identifying and communicating gaps in current
community and health care resources; and
3. Build individual and community capacity by increasing health
knowledge and self-sufficiency through a range of activities such as
outreach, community education, coaching, mentoring, social support,
and advocacy.
Req. No. 11346 Page 2

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1280.4 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules to:
1. Adopt a set of standards for the approval of certified
community health worker initial coursework or curriculum;
2. Establish examination administration requirements for the
Department or one or more designees;
3. Define minimum qualifications for applicants to be
certified; and
4. Establish the criteria for granting, denying, suspending,
and revoking a certificate to protect public health and safety.
B. The Commissioner may also promulgate rules necessary for the
proper administration and enforcement of the Oklahoma Community
Health Worker Act and which allow for reciprocity agreements
including, but not limited to, with the Indian Health Service,
Tribal Contract or Compact Health Centers, Urban Indian Health
Centers, and tribal health systems.
C. The Commissioner shall prescribe fees for the certified
community health worker examination, initial certification, and
certification renewal.



Req. No. 11346 Page 3

SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11346 TKR 01/15/25





















Req. No. 11346 Page 4